Illinois, session 104th, HB2247.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Firearm Dealer License Certification Act is 5amended by changing Section 5-120 as follows: 6    (430 ILCS 68/5-120)7    Sec. 5-120. Federal agencies and investigations. Nothing 8in this Act shall be construed to interfere with any federal 9agency or any federal agency investigation. All Illinois State 10Police rules adopted under this Act shall comply with federal 11law. The The Illinois State Police may as necessary coordinate 12efforts with relevant State and federal law enforcement 13agencies to enforce this Act.14(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21.)